Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1638.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Ensuring Reproductive Freedom by Shielding Our Providers Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Dispenser." A person lawfully authorized to dispense mail order and Internet sales of pharmaceuticals in this Commonwealth."Pharmacy." As defined in section 2(12) of the act of September 27, 1961 (P.L.1700, No.699), known as the Pharmacy Act.1234567891011121314151617 "Physician." As defined in section 2(17) of the Pharmacy Act."Prescriber." A person who is licensed, registered or otherwise lawfully authorized to distribute, dispense or administer mifepristone or misoprostol, or a generic alternative to mifepristone or misoprostol, in the course of professional practice in this Commonwealth."Provider." Any of the following:(1) A physician or other health care professional authorized by law to prescribe mifepristone or misoprostol, or a generic alternative to mifepristone or misoprostol.(2) A prescriber.Section 3. Prescription label.(a) Request.--A provider may request that a dispenser or pharmacy include on a prescription label for mifepristone or misoprostol, or a generic alternative to mifepristone or misoprostol, the name of the provider's health care practice instead of the name of the provider.(b) Requirement.--If a provider makes a request under subsection (a), the dispenser or pharmacy shall use the name of the provider's health care practice instead of the name of the provider on the prescription label.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250HB1638PN1988 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324